test/src/morphology/V-kasuma48_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kasuma: # Verb (48) kasuma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kasuma+V+Inf/mA: kasuma
     kasuma+V+Inf: kassuq
     kasuma+V+ActPrtPrc: kasunuq
     kasuma+V+PssPrtPrc: kasut
     kasuma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: kasu
     kasuma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: kasus
     kasuma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `kasvi
     kasuma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: `kasvi
